Washington statutes.
RCW 18.270.040

Application requirements—Certificate without examination.

(1) Every applicant for a certificate shall pay an examination fee and satisfactorily pass an examination as provided by rule.

(2) Every applicant for a certificate shall apply to the director on an application form provided by the director and pay the application fee as provided by rule.

(3)(a) Every applicant for a journey-level sprinkler fitter certificate shall provide evidence to the director on a form provided by the director of at least eight thousand hours of trade-related fire protection sprinkler fitting experience.

(b) Every applicant for a residential sprinkler fitter certificate shall provide evidence to the director on a form provided by the director of at least four thousand hours of trade-related fire protection sprinkler fitting or residential sprinkler fitting experience.

(4) Every applicant for a training certificate shall provide evidence to the director on a form provided by the director of trade-related employment by a contractor.

(5)(a) The director shall grant a journey-level sprinkler fitter certificate without examination to any applicant who, during the ninety days following January 1, 2009, submits an application for such certification and evidence of his or her employment as a journey-level sprinkler fitter for a period of not less than eight thousand hours.

(b) The director shall grant a residential sprinkler fitter certificate without examination to any applicant who, during the ninety days following January 1, 2009, submits an application for such certification and evidence of his or her employment as a journey-level sprinkler fitter or a residential sprinkler fitter for a period of not less than four thousand hours.

(6) The director may grant a certificate without examination to any applicant who is a journey-level sprinkler fitter or residential sprinkler fitter from a state whose requirements for certification are at least substantially equivalent to the requirements of this state, and which extends the same privileges of reciprocity to journey-level sprinkler fitters or residential sprinkler fitters from this state.

[ 2007 c 435 s 5.]